Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (05) Grooming in violation of section 709.8A. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 180, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor